Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.413.050

Standards of practice.

(1) The board shall adopt state standards of practice for paraeducators that are based on the recommendations of the paraeducator work group established in chapter 136, Laws of 2014. These standards must include:

(a) Supporting instructional opportunities;

(b) Demonstrating professionalism and ethical practices;

(c) Supporting a positive and safe learning environment;

(d) Communicating effectively and participating in the team process; and

(e) The standards of practice developed by the Washington professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.260.

(2) By January 1, 2020, in order to ensure that paraeducators can recognize signs of emotional or behavioral distress in students and appropriately refer students for assistance and support, the board shall incorporate into the standards of practice for paraeducators adopted under subsection (1) of this section the social-emotional learning standards, benchmarks, and related competencies described in RCW 28A.410.270.

[ 2021 c 197 s 12; 2019 c 386 s 5; 2017 c 237 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.